en: Iron Accessories
xx: Iron Accessories
cs: Žehličky – příslušenství
da: Strygejern – tilbehør
de: Bügeleisenzubehör
es: Accesorios para plancha
fr: Accessoires pour fers à repasser
it: Accessori ferro da stiro
ja: アイロン関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor strijkijzers
no: Strykejerntilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do żelazek
pt: Acessórios para passar roupa
ru: Принадлежности для утюгов
sv: Strykjärnstillbehör
tr: Ütü Aksesuarları

en: Steam Press Accessories
xx: Steam Press Accessories
cs: Parní žehlicí lisy – příslušenství
da: Damppresse – tilbehør
de: Zubehör für Dampfpressen
es: Accesorios para prensas de planchado a vapor
fr: Accessoires pour presses à repasser
it: Accessori presse a vapore
ja: スチームアイロン関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor stoompersen
no: Tilbehør til damppresse
pl: Akcesoria do prasowalnic
pt: Acessórios para prensa a vapor
ru: Принадлежности для гладильных прессов
sv: Ångpresstillbehör
tr: Buharlı Pres Aksesuarları

en: Washer & Dryer Accessories
xx: Washer & Dryer Accessories
cs: Příslušenství k pračkám a sušičkám
da: Tilbehør til vaskemaskiner og tørretumblere
de: Zubehör für Waschmaschinen und Wäschetrockner
es: Accesorios para lavadoras y secadoras
fr: Accessoires pour lave-linge et sèche-linge
it: Accessori per lavatrici e asciugatrici
ja: 洗濯機/乾燥機用品
nl: Accessoires voor wasmachines en drogers
no: Tilbehør til vaskemaskiner og tørketromler
pl: Akcesoria do pralek i suszarek
pt: Acessórios para lavadoras e secadoras de roupas
ru: Принадлежности для стиральных и сушильных машин
sv: Tvättmaskin och torktumlare
tr: Çamaşır Makinesi ve Kurutma Makinesi Aksesuarları

en: Patio Heater Accessories
xx: Patio Heater Accessories
cs: Venkovní ohřívače – příslušenství
da: Terrassevarmer – tilbehør
de: Heizpilz-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para estufas de exteriores
fr: Accessoires pour chauffage extérieur
it: Accessori stufe a fungo da esterno
ja: パラソルヒーター関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor terrasverwarmers
no: Tilbehør til utendørsovner
pl: Akcesoria do ogrzewaczy ogrodowych
pt: Acessórios para aquecedores de terraços
ru: Принадлежности для уличных обогревателей
sv: Tillbehör till terrassvärmare
tr: Şemsiye Soba Aksesuarları

en: Patio Heater Covers
xx: Patio Heater Covers
cs: Kryty na venkovní ohřívače
da: Terrassevarmer – covers
de: Heizpilz-Abdeckungen
es: Fundas de estufas de exteriores
fr: Protection pour chauffage extérieur
it: Copertura stufe a fungo da esterno
ja: パラソルヒーターカバー
nl: Hoezen voor terrasverwarmers
no: Deksler til utendørsovner
pl: Osłony do ogrzewaczy ogrodowych
pt: Capas para aquecedores de terraços
ru: Чехлы для уличных обогревателей
sv: Höljen för terrassvärmare
tr: Şemsiye Soba Muhafazaları

en: Vacuum Accessories
xx: Vacuum Accessories
cs: Vysavače – příslušenství
da: Støvsuger – tilbehør
de: Staubsaugerzubehör
es: Accesorios para aspiradoras
fr: Accessoires pour aspirateurs
it: Articoli per aspirapolvere
ja: 掃除機関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor stofzuigers
no: Støvsugertilbehør
pl: Akcesoria do odkurzaczy
pt: Acessórios para aspiradores
ru: Принадлежности для пылесосов
sv: Dammsugartillbehör
tr: Elektrik Süpürgesi Aksesuarları

en: Water Heater Accessories
xx: Water Heater Accessories
cs: Ohřívače vody\, bojlery – příslušenství
da: Vandvarmer – tilbehør
de: Boiler-Zubehör
es: Accesorios para calentadores de agua
fr: Accessoires pour chauffe-eau
it: Accessori riscaldatori ad acqua
ja: 湯沸器・給湯器関連用品
nl: Accessoires voor boilers
no: Tilbehør til varmtvannsberedere
pl: Akcesoria do podgrzewaczy wody
pt: Acessórios para aquecedores de água
ru: Принадлежности для водонагревателей
sv: Tillbehör till varmvattenberedare
tr: Termosifon Aksesuarları

en: Anode Rods
xx: Anode Rods
cs: Anodové tyče
da: Anodestænger
de: Opferanoden
es: Varillas de ánodo
fr: Tiges d'anode
it: Aste anodo
ja: アノードロッド
nl: Anodestaven
no: Anodestaver
pl: Anody
pt: Hastes de eletrodo positivo para aquecedores
ru: Анодные стержни
sv: Anoder
tr: Anot Çubukları

en: Hot Water Tanks
xx: Hot Water Tanks
cs: Zásobníky teplé vody
da: Varmtvandsbeholdere
de: Boiler
es: Cilindros para agua caliente
fr: Réservoirs d'eau chaude
it: Serbatoi per scaldabagno
ja: 貯湯槽
nl: Warmwatertanks
no: Varmtvannstanker
pl: Bojlery
pt: Cilindros de água quente
ru: Баки для горячей воды
sv: Varmvattenscylinder
tr: Sıcak Su Kazanları

en: Water Heater Elements
xx: Water Heater Elements
cs: Díly pro ohřívače vody
da: Vandvarmer – elementer
de: Heizelemente
es: Elementos de calentador
fr: Éléments pour chauffe-eau
it: Elementi riscaldatori
ja: 湯沸器・給湯器部品
nl: Verwarmingselementen
no: Varmtvannselementer
pl: Elementy podgrzewaczy wody
pt: Elementos para aquecedores
ru: Нагревательные элементы для водонагревателей
sv: Varmvattenbatterier
tr: Termosifon Elemanları

en: Water Heater Expansion Tanks
xx: Water Heater Expansion Tanks
cs: Expanzní nádoby pro ohřívače vody
da: Vandvarmer – udvidelsestanke
de: Ausgleichsgefäß für Warmwasserbereiter
es: Depósitos de expansión para calentadores de agua
fr: Vases d'expansion pour chauffe-eau
it: Serbatoi di espansione per riscaldatori d'acqua
ja: 給湯器膨張タンク
nl: Expansievaten voor boilers
no: Ekspansjonstanker til varmtvannsberedere
pl: Dodatkowe zbiorniki do bojlerów
pt: Tanques de expansão do aquecedor de água
ru: Расширительные баки
sv: Expansionstank för varmvattenberedare
tr: Su Isıtıcı Genişleme Tankları

en: Water Heater Pans
xx: Water Heater Pans
cs: Ochranné desky pod ohřívače vody
da: Vandvarmer – bakker
de: Boilerwannen
es: Bandeja para calentador
fr: Réceptacles pour chauffe-eau
it: Pannelli riscaldatori
ja: 湯沸器・給湯器用パン
nl: Boilerlekbakken
no: Varmtvannspanner
pl: Podstawki do podgrzewaczy wody
pt: Bandejas para aquecedores
ru: Поддоны для водонагревателей
sv: Tankar till varmvattenberedare
tr: Termosifon Altlıkları

en: Water Heater Stacks
xx: Water Heater Stacks
cs: Ohřívače vody se zásobníkem
da: Vandvarmer – stakke
de: Abgasrohre
es: Chimeneas para calentador
fr: Cuves pour chauffe-eau
it: Pile riscaldatori
ja: 湯沸器・給湯器用スタック
nl: Verwarmingskanalen
no: Piper for varmtvannsberedere
pl: Stojaki na podgrzewaczy wody
pt: Chaminés para aquecedores
ru: Дымовые трубы для водонагревателей
sv: Skorstenar till varmvattenberedare
tr: Termosifon Bacaları

en: Water Heater Vents
xx: Water Heater Vents
cs: Odvod spalin z ohřívače vody
da: Vandvarmer – aftræk
de: Heizungslüftung
es: Rejillas de ventilación para calentador
fr: Bouches d'aération pour chauffe-eau
it: Sfiati riscaldatori
ja: 湯沸器・給湯器用排気設備
nl: Boilerventilatie
no: Avtrekk for varmtvannsberedere
pl: Przewody wentylacyjne do podgrzewaczy wody
pt: Respiros para aquecedores
ru: Вытяжные системы водонагревателей
sv: Ventiler till varmvattenberedare
tr: Termosifon Havalandırmaları

en: Household Appliances
xx: Household Appliances
cs: Domácí spotřebiče
da: Husholdningsapparater
de: Haushaltsgeräte
es: Electrodomésticos
fr: Appareils électroménagers, Equipement d'entretien, Gros appareil électroménager (hors froid), Petit Équipement Électrique et Électronique (EEE), Abj Electrique, Gros électroménager hors réfrigérant, Petit électroménager
it: Dispositivi elettrodomestici
ja: 家電
nl: Huishoudelijke apparaten
no: Husholdningsapparater
pl: Sprzęt AGD
pt: Eletrodomésticos
ru: Бытовые приборы
sv: Hushållsapparater
tr: Ev Aletleri

en: Climate Control Appliances
xx: Climate Control Appliances
cs: Klimatizační zařízení
da: Klimakontroludstyr
de: Klimatisierung
es: Control del clima
fr: Chauffage et climatisation
it: Controllo climatizzazione
ja: 冷暖房空調設備
nl: Klimaatregeling
no: Apparater for klimakontroll
pl: Ogrzewanie\, wentylacja i klimatyzacja
pt: Controle climático
ru: Климат-контроль
sv: Apparater för klimatkontroll
tr: Hava Kontrol Aygıtları

en: Air Conditioners
xx: Air Conditioners
cs: Klimatizace
da: Klimaanlæg
de: Klimaanlagen
es: Sistemas de aire acondicionado
fr: Climatiseurs, Climatiseur
it: Condizionatori aria
ja: エアコン
nl: Airconditioning
no: Klimaanlegg
pl: Klimatyzatory
pt: Aparelhos de ar condicionado
ru: Кондиционеры воздуха
sv: Luftkonditionerare
tr: Klimalar

en: Air Purifiers
xx: Air Purifiers
cs: Čističky vzduchu
da: Luftrensere
de: Luftreiniger
es: Purificadores de aire
fr: Purificateurs d'air
it: Purificatori aria
ja: 空気清浄機
nl: Luchtzuiveraars
no: Luftrensere
pl: Oczyszczacze powietrza
pt: Purificadores de ar
ru: Очистители воздуха
sv: Luftrenare
tr: Hava Arıtıcılar

en: Dehumidifiers
xx: Dehumidifiers
cs: Odvlhčovače
da: Fugtfjernere
de: Luftentfeuchter
es: Deshumidificadores
fr: Déshumidificateurs
it: Deumidificatori
ja: 除湿機
nl: Ontvochtigers
no: Avfuktingsapparater
pl: Osuszacze
pt: Desumidificadores
ru: Осушители
sv: Avfuktningsapparater
tr: Nem Gidericiler

en: Duct Heaters
xx: Duct Heaters
cs: Ohřívače vzduchu do potrubí
da: Varmekanaler
de: Kanalheizer
es: Calentadores de conductos
fr: Chauffe-air
it: Termoconvettori
ja: ダクトヒーター
nl: Kanaalverwarmers
no: Kanalvarmere
pl: Piece nadmuchowe
pt: Aquecedores de duto
ru: Канальные воздухонагреватели
sv: Kanalvärmare
tr: Kanal Tipi Isıtıcılar